Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2075.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Title 15, chapter 5, article 1, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 15-503.01, to read: START_STATUTE15-503.01. Superintendents; assistant superintendents; associate superintendents; chief financial officers; employment contracts; posting requirements; annual report A. Each school district governing board shall submit to the department of education both of the following: 1.either: (a) A copy of the employment contract, including any extension or amendment to the contract, for each individual who has been employed by the school district during the preceding five school years as a superintendent, an assistant superintendent, an associate superintendent or a chief financial officer. (b) An attestation stating that the school district has not employed a superintendent, an assistant superintendent, an associate superintendent or a chief financial officer during the preceding five school years. 2. either: (a) a copy of the employment contract, including any extension or amendment to the contract, for each individual who is currently employed as a superintendent, an assistant superintendent, an associate superintendent or a chief financial officer not later than thirty days after the date on which the school DISTRICT entered into the contract or approved the extension or amendment to the contract. (b) an affidavit stating that the employment contract of the superintendent, assistant superintendent, associate superintendent or chief financial officer, as applicable, is the same as the employment contract that the school district submitted for the immediately preceding year.  an affidavit submitted pursuant to this subdivision must be submitted not later than thirty days after the anniversary of the date on which the school district entered into the contract. B. The department shall: 1.post all contracts that are submitted pursuant to subsection A of this section on the department's website.  The department may not remove a contract that is posted pursuant to this subsection until at least five years after the date on which the employment of the superintendent, assistant superintendent, associate superintendent or chief financial officer is terminated.  The department may redact personally identifiable information that is exempt from public disclosure as a matter of law before posting an employment contract on the department's website. 2. create a searchable online database that is posted on the department's website and that contains, at a minimum, the following information from each contract that is submitted pursuant to subsection a of this section: (a) the school district's name. (b) the base salary for each superintendent, ASSISTANT superintendent, associate superintendent and chief financial officer who is employed by the school district. (c) the total amount of performance based pay that the school district governing board awards to each superintendent, assistant superintendent, associate superintendent and chief financial officer. (d) the total amount of employer contributions for retirement benefits for each superintendent, assistant superintendent, associate superintendent and chief financial officer. (e) the total amount of STIPENDS paid to each superintendent, assistant superintendent, associate superintendent and chief financial officer who is employed by the school district, disaggregated by the purpose or type of stipend. (f) the total hours of personal leave and paid time off that are awarded to each superintendent, assistant superintendent, associate superintendent and chief financial officer. (g) whether each superintendent, assistant superintendent, associate superintendent and chief financial officer is entitled to payment for unused personal leave and paid time off. (h) the total amount of employer contributions for health insurance premiums for the spouse and DEpENDeNTS of each superintendent, ASSISTANT SUPERINTENDENT, Associate superintendent and chief financial officer. (i) the total amount of employer contributions for life insurance for each superintendent, assistant superintendent, ASSOCIATE superintendent and chief financial officer. C. Each school district governing board shall post on the school district's website a copy of each contract and attestation that the governing board submits to the department pursuant to subsection A of this section.  A school district may not remove a contract that is posted pursuant to this subsection until at least five years after the date on which the employment of the superintendent, assistant superintendent, associate superintendent or chief financial officer is terminated.  A school district may redact personally identifiable information that is exempt from public disclosure as a matter of law before posting an employment contract on the school district's website. D. On or before December 1 of each year, the department of education shall compile a report that includes all of the following information for each school district in this state and shall post the report on the department's website: 1. If the school district employs a superintendent pursuant to section 15-503: (a) The base salary of the superintendent. (b) A list of all employee benefits that the superintendent may receive pursuant to the superintendent's employment contract, including, if applicable, the monetary value of each benefit. (c) If the superintendent has a car allowance under the superintendent's employment contract, the amount of the allowance. 2. If, pursuant to section 15-502 or 15-503, the school district employs an assistant superintendent, associate superintendent or chief financial officer, or any combination of assistant superintendents, associate superintendents and chief financial officers: (a) The base salary of each assistant superintendent, associate superintendent and chief financial officer. (b) A list of all employee benefits that each assistant superintendent, associate superintendent and chief financial officer may receive pursuant to the individual's employment contract, including, if applicable, the monetary value of each benefit. (c) if the assistant superintendent, associate superintendent or chief financial officer has a car allowance under the individual's employment contract, the amount of the allowance. END_STATUTE